Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-305.02
Psychiatric services; operation; laws governing.

The psychiatric services at the University of Nebraska Medical Center shall operate and be subject to sections 83-305 to 83-357.

Laws 1953, c. 345, § 5, p. 1122;

Laws 1987, LB 112, § 3.